Indiana, session 2026, SJR11.
Be it enacted by the
General Assembly of the State of Indiana"; and no law shall be enacted,
except by bill.
2026 SJ 11—SJ 9609/DI 150


(b) The people reserve to themselves the power, independent of
the General Assembly, to do the following:
(1) Propose statutes and amendments to the Constitution of
the State of Indiana.
(2) Adopt or reject their proposed statutes or amendments to
the Constitution of the State of Indiana by ballot.
(3) Approve or reject by ballot any statute, or section or part
of any statute, enacted by the General Assembly.
(c) The style of every statute enacted by the people shall be: "Be
it enacted by the People of the State of Indiana:". The style of
every statute enacted by the General Assembly shall be: "Be it
enacted by the People of the State of Indiana, through the General
Assembly:".
SECTION 3. ARTICLE 4 OF THE CONSTITUTION OF THE
STATE OF INDIANA IS AMENDED BY ADDING A NEW
SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS: Section 31. (a) As used in this
section, "initiative" means the power of the voters of Indiana to
approve or reject an amendment to the Constitution of the State of
Indiana.
(b) An initiative shall be submitted to the voters of Indiana if a
petition containing the text of the proposed initiative is approved
by the number of Indiana voters equal to five percent (5%) of the
total number of votes cast for Secretary of State at the most recent
election for Secretary of State.
SECTION 4. ARTICLE 4 OF THE CONSTITUTION OF THE
STATE OF INDIANA IS AMENDED BY ADDING A NEW
SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS: Section 32. (a) As used in this
section, "referendum" means the power of the voters of Indiana to
approve or reject:
(1) a statute;
(2) a part of a statute; or
(3) parts of statutes;
enacted by the General Assembly.
(b) A referendum shall be submitted as a public question to the
voters of Indiana if a petition identifying the statute or part of the
statute enacted by the General Assembly to be approved or
rejected is signed by the number of Indiana voters equal to five
percent (5%) of the total number of votes cast for Secretary of
State at the most recent election for Secretary of State.
SECTION 5. ARTICLE 4 OF THE CONSTITUTION OF THE
STATE OF INDIANA IS AMENDED BY ADDING A NEW
SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS: Section 33. (a) As used in this
2026 SJ 11—SJ 9609/DI 150


section, "initiative" means the power of the voters of Indiana to
approve or reject an amendment to the Constitution of the State of
Indiana.
(b) As used in this section, "referendum" means the power of
the voters of Indiana to approve or reject:
(1) a statute;
(2) a part of a statute; or
(3) parts of statutes;
enacted by the General Assembly.
(c) If an initiative or a referendum is approved by a majority of
the votes cast on the initiative or referendum, the initiative or
referendum takes effect, subject to subsection (d), five days after
the date the results of the public question are certified as provided
by law, unless the initiative or referendum provides otherwise.
(d) If an initiative requires, either implicitly or explicitly, that
a government entity spend money to carry out the initiative, the
statute or amended statute does not take effect until the initiative
or another statute provides a source of funding to the government
entities required to carry out the initiative.
(e) If a referendum petition is filed against part of a statute, the
remainder of the statute is not delayed from taking effect.
(f) If provisions of two or more initiatives or referenda
approved at the same election conflict, the provisions of the
initiative or referendum receiving the highest affirmative vote
prevails.
(g) The General Assembly may amend or repeal a statute
created or amended by a referendum.
(h) The veto power of the governor does not extend to an
initiative or a referendum statute approved by the voters.
SECTION 6. ARTICLE 4 OF THE CONSTITUTION OF THE
STATE OF INDIANA IS AMENDED BY ADDING A NEW
SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS: Section 34. The General
Assembly shall provide by law for the exercise of initiative and
referendum powers by the voters of each unit of local government.
2026 SJ 11—SJ 9609/DI 150